District of Columbia statutes.
38-824.02

Physical and health education requirements.

(a)

Public schools and public charter schools shall provide physical education as follows:

(1)

For students in Kindergarten through Grade 5:

(A)

School years 2010-2011 to 2013-2014: an average of at least 30 minutes per week or the same level of physical education as provided in school year 2009-2010, whichever is greater; and

(B)

School year 2014-2015 and after: an average of at least 150 minutes per week;

(2)

For students in Grades 6 through 8:

(A)

School years 2010-2011 to 2013-2014: an average of at least 45 minutes per week or the same level of physical education as provided in school year 2009-2010, whichever is greater; and

(B)

School year 2014-2015 and after: an average of at least 225 minutes per week.

(3)

At least 50% of physical education class time shall be devoted to actual physical activity, with as much class time as possible spent in moderate-to-vigorous physical activity.

(b)

Public schools and public charter schools shall provide health education to students in Grades Kindergarten through 8 as follows:

(1)

School years 2010-2011 to 2013-2014: an average of at least 15 minutes per week or the same level of health education as provided in school year 2009-2010, whichever is greater; and

(2)

School year 2014-2015 and after: an average of at least 75 minutes per week;

(c)

The State Board of Education, with assistance from the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, shall consider ways to expand physical education in high schools.

(d)

The physical education and health education required by this section shall meet the curricular standards adopted by the State Board of Education.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 402, 57 DCR 4779
This section is referenced in § 38-821.02.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4062(i) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4062(i) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).